Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 21.
LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS

Chapter

371 Department of Labor and Industrial Relations

371K Community Services

372 Apprenticeship

373 Commercial Employment Agencies

373C Occupational and Career Information

373E Statewide Transition to Work System--Repealed

373F Tourism Training Council--Repealed

373K Professional Employment Organizations--Repealed

373L Professional Employer Organizations

374 Emigrant Agents--Repealed

375 Garment Industry Homework--Repealed

376 Industrial Safety--Repealed

377 Hawaii Employment Relations Act

378 Employment Practices

379 Recruiting and Hiring of Employees During
Labor Disputes

379A Picketing of Residence or Dwelling Place

380 Labor Disputes; Jurisdiction of Courts

381 Labor Disputes; Public Utilities

382 Labor Disputes; Stevedoring Industry

383 Hawaii Employment Security Law

384 Hawaii Agricultural Unemployment Compensation

Law--Repealed

385 Additional Unemployment Compensation Benefits
Law

386 Workers' Compensation Law

386A Hawaii State Compensation Mutual Insurance
Fund

387 Wage and Hour Law

388 Wages and Other Compensation, Payment of

390 Child Labor Law

392 Temporary Disability Insurance

393 Prepaid Health Care Act

394 Manpower Development and Training

394A Job Training--Repealed

394B Dislocated Workers

396 Occupational Safety and Health

397 Boiler and Elevator Safety Law

398 Family Leave

398A Leave of Absence for Organ, Bone Marrow, or
Peripheral

Blood Stem Cell Donation

Note

Skilled worker and business development center at each
University of Hawaii community college. L Sp 2009, c 34.

CHAPTER
371

DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

371-1 Definitions

371-2 Definition: references to "this
chapter"

371-3 Legal assistance

371-4 Labor and industrial relations appeals
board

371-5 Repealed

371-6 Powers respecting oaths, subpoenas, etc.;
witness

fees, expenses, immunities

371-7 Duties and powers of the department;
rules,

procedure for varying

371-8 Duties and powers of director; enforcement
of rules

371-9 Penalties

371-10 Mediation of labor disputes

371-11 Research and statistics; employers to keep
certain

records

371-12 Labor law enforcement; injunction

371-13 Cooperation with federal agencies

371-14 Repealed

371-15 Manpower planning administrator

371-16 Employers and entities offering long-term
care

insurance policies

371-17 Millennium workforce development training
program

371-18 Staffing for federally funded programs

371-18.5 Workforce advisory boards; established

371-19 Hawaii agriculture workforce advisory
board;

established

371-19.2 Hawaii healthcare workforce advisory
board;

established

371-20 National Human Trafficking Resource Center
hotline;

posting requirement; penalty

Part II. Language Access--Repealed

371-31 to 37 Repealed

Note

Skilled worker and business development center at each
University of Hawaii community college. L Sp 2009, c 34.

Working group on documentation for state civil identification
card; reports to 2016-2017 legislature (dissolved on June 30, 2017). L 2015, c
243.

Cross References

Civil rights commission, see chapter 368.

Departmental data sharing (improving educational and
workforce outcomes), see §27-7.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next